Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 12
COMMERCIAL FERTILIZERS AND SOIL CONDITIONERS

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 13 of chapter 6, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1971, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1971, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

35-12-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Commercial Fertilizer, Soil Conditioner, and Plant Amendment Act".

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 133, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1581, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1608, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-102. Administration of article.

This article shall be administered by the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's duly authorized representatives.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 133, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-2.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1608, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Availability" means the immediate potential property of a plant nutrient to be utilized by a plant and have agronomic value when used according to directions.

"Bulk fertilizer", "bulk soil conditioner", or "bulk plant amendment" means a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment, respectively, distributed in nonpackaged form or in a container containing more than one hundred pounds.

"Commercial fertilizer" means a fertilizer or other substance containing one or more essential available plant nutrients that is distributed for its plant nutrient content and is designed for use and has value in promoting plant growth. "Commercial fertilizer" does not include untreated manures, compost and treated manure distributed without commercial fertilizer labeling, soil conditioners, plant amendments, and other products exempted by rule of the commissioner.

"Commission" means the state agricultural commission.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture of Colorado or the commissioner's authorized agent.

"Compost" means a substance, derived from a process of biologically degrading organic materials, that contains one or more essential available plant nutrients and complies with the minimum standards specified by rule of the commissioner that regulate compost.

"Custom mix" means a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment prepared expressly for, and according to specifications furnished by, a customer prior to mixing.

"Department" means the Colorado department of agriculture and includes the state agricultural commission, the commissioner of agriculture, and all employees and agents of the department.

"Distribute" means to import, consign, sell, offer to sell, barter, or otherwise supply a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, compost, or manure, for use in or shipment to this state.

"Distributor" means any person who distributes a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, compost, or manure.

"Essential" means necessary for the maintenance and growth of plants.

"Fertilizer" means a substance or product that contains one or more essential available plant nutrients.

"Grade" means the percentage of total nitrogen, available phosphate, and soluble potash in the same terms, order, and percentages as in the guaranteed analysis.

"Guaranteed analysis" means the minimum percentage of plant nutrients claimed in the following order and form:

Total Nitrogen (N) ....................
percent

Available Phosphate (P

2

O

5

) ....................
percent

Soluble Potash (K

2

O) ....................
percent

Guarantees for plant nutrients, other than nitrogen, phosphorus, and potassium, may be permitted or required by rule of the commissioner. The guarantees for these other nutrients shall be expressed in the form, availability, and minimum quantity of the element set by rule. The sources of nutrients, salts, chelates, and similar compounds are required to be stated on the application for registration and may be included as a parenthetical statement on the label.

Guaranteed analysis of a custom mix may appear as in paragraph (a) of this subsection (14) or may include the net weight and guaranteed analysis of each plant nutrient or fertilizer in the mix.

"Investigational allowance" means an allowance for variations inherent in the taking, preparation, and analysis of an official sample of commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment.

"Label" means the display of all written, printed, or graphic matter on the immediate container of, or a statement accompanying, a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, compost, or manure.

"Labeling" means all written, printed, graphic, or verbal information on, accompanying, or used in promoting any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, compost, or manure, including advertisements, brochures, and posters and television, radio, and internet announcements.

"Manufacturing facility" means any place where a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost is manufactured, produced, compounded, mixed, blended, or in any way altered chemically or physically. Mobile units shall be considered a part of the manufacturing facility where the units are based.

"Manure" means animal or vegetable manure and includes treated and untreated manure.

"Official sample" means any sample of commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, compost, or manure that is taken and designated as "official" by the department.

"Packaged fertilizer", "packaged soil conditioner", or "packaged plant amendment" means a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment, respectively, that is distributed in a closed container and contains one hundred pounds or less of the commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment.

"Percent" or "percentage" means the percentage by weight.

"Plant amendment and soil conditioner guaranteed analysis" means the percentage of each of the ingredients.

"Plant amendments" means any devices or substances applied to the soil, plants, or seeds that are intended to improve germination, growth, yield, product quality, reproduction, flavor, or other desirable characteristics of plants. "Plant amendments" does not include commercial fertilizers, soil amendments, untreated manures, pesticides, plant regulators, compost and treated manures that are distributed without plant amendment labeling, or other materials exempted by rules promulgated by the commissioner.

"Plant nutrients" means those chemical or organic forms of nitrogen (N), phosphorus (P2O5), potassium (K2O), other secondary and micronutrients, calcium (Ca), magnesium (Mg), sulfur (S), boron (B), copper (Cu), iron (Fe), manganese (Mn), molybdenum (Mo), or zinc (Zn) that are absorbed by crops and are essential to the plants.

"Product" means a commercial fertilizer, plant amendment, or soil conditioner in the form in which it is intended to be distributed. For the purposes of this article, a product that differs from another product in the name of the product, composition, labeling claims or directions for use, grade, or guaranteed analysis shall be considered a separate product that requires its own registration.

"Registrant" means a person who is registered or is required to be registered to manufacture or distribute commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners, plant amendments, or compost under the provisions of this article.

"Sewage sludge, sewage effluents, and biosolids" means all materials resulting from domestic wastewater treatment that contain concentrations of organic or inorganic materials.

"Soil conditioner" means a substance, defined by rule of the commissioner, intended to improve the chemical or physical characteristics of the soil that is sold, offered for sale, or intended for sale. It does not include commercial fertilizers, plant amendments, untreated manures, compost and treated manures that are distributed without soil conditioner labeling claims, or any other materials that may be exempted by rule of the commissioner. Soil conditioners may be sold in package or in bulk.

"Specialty fertilizer" means a commercial fertilizer distributed primarily for nonfarm use, such as home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers, golf courses, parks, and cemeteries.

"Ton" means a net weight of two thousand pounds avoirdupois.

"Treated manures" means substances composed primarily of excreta, plant or animal material, sewage sludge, sewage effluents, and biosolids, or mixtures of such substances that have been treated in any manner, including mechanical drying, grinding, pelleting, or other means, or by adding other chemicals or substances.

"Untreated manures" means substances composed primarily of excreta, plant remains, or mixtures of such substances that have not been treated in any manner, including mechanical drying, grinding, pelleting, or other means, or by adding other chemicals or substances.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 133, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-3.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1581, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2), (16)(a)(I), (16)(b), and (20) amended, p. 101, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1608, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

IP and (30) amended, (HB 19-1329), ch. 267, p. 2513, § 1, effective May 23.

35-12-104. Registration.

Each product shall be registered by the person whose name appears on the label before being distributed in, into, or for use in this state. The application for registration shall be submitted to the commissioner on forms furnished by the commissioner and shall be accompanied by a fee established by the commission. For each fiscal year, commencing on July 1, fifty percent of the department's direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing this article shall be funded from the general fund. The commission shall establish a fee schedule to cover any direct and indirect costs not funded from the general fund. All registrations shall expire annually on the date specified by rule of the commissioner. Applications for renewal of registrations must be submitted on or before such date. Each application for registration or renewal of registration shall include the following information:

The name and address of the registrant;

The name of the product;

The grade, if a commercial fertilizer;

The guaranteed analysis;

The sources from which the guaranteed plant nutrients, soil conditioner, or plant amendment derive; and

One copy of the label used in this state for the sale of each of the products being registered.

(1.5) Repealed.

The registration requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to custom mix fertilizers, untreated manure, or compost and treated manures that are distributed without commercial fertilizer, plant amendment, or soil conditioner labeling claims.

The commissioner may require proof of labeling statements and other claims made for any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment before approving any registration. If the registrant makes no claims, the commissioner may require proof of the usefulness and value of the commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment. As evidence of proof, the commissioner may rely on experimental data, evaluations, or advice furnished by experts such as Colorado state university and may accept or reject additional sources of proof in evaluating any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment. In all cases, only experimental proof shall relate to those conditions in Colorado for which use the product is intended.

Commercial fertilizer shall contain the minimum stipulated quantities of plant nutrients required by rules promulgated by the commissioner.

The commissioner may stipulate by rule the quantities of active substances required in soil conditioners or plant amendments to be sold or distributed for use in this state.

No commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment shall be sold or distributed for use in this state without a current registration. Any person who fails to renew the registration of commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment on or before the expiration date of the registration shall pay a late fee, as established by the commission, in addition to the registration fee.

Each manufacturing facility that produces custom mixes in this state must be registered. All registrations shall expire annually on the date specified by rule of the commissioner. Applications for renewal of registrations must be submitted on or before such date.

Each manufacturing facility in this state producing compost that is distributed without commercial fertilizer, plant amendment, or soil conditioner claims shall register with the commissioner unless exempted by rule of the commissioner.

The application for registration shall be submitted to the commissioner on forms furnished by the commissioner and shall be accompanied by a fee established by the commission. Any person who fails to renew said manufacturing facility registration shall pay a late fee, as established by the commission, in addition to the registration fee.

At the time of registration, each manufacturing facility shall submit copies of all labels that will be affixed to or accompany the compost products it distributes.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 136, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-4.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1585, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) and (3) repealed, p. 102, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 98:

(1.5) added, p. 1341, § 64, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (7) amended, p. 1725, § 5, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

IP(1) and (7) amended, p. 1268, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

IP(1) and (7) amended, p. 1903, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1613, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

IP(1) amended and (1.5) added, (HB 10-1377), ch. 212, p. 921, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 2013:

IP(1) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1697, § 107, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1.5)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (1.5), effective July 1, 2012. (See L. 2010, p. 921.)

35-12-105. Labels.

Any packaged commercial fertilizer distributed in this state shall have placed on or affixed to the container a label setting forth in clearly legible and conspicuous form the following information:

The name and address of the registrant;

The net weight or other measure prescribed by rule;

The name of the product and grade;

The guaranteed analysis in the form specified in section 35-12-103 (14)(a);

The date of manufacture, processing, packaging, or repackaging, or a code that permits the determination of such date, or, if distributed in bulk, the shipment or delivery date;

Directions for use as specified by rule of the commissioner.

Any commercial fertilizer distributed in this state in bulk shall be accompanied by a printed or written statement showing the information required in subsection (1) of this section.

Any packaged soil conditioner or plant amendment distributed in this state shall have placed or affixed on the container a label setting forth in clearly legible and conspicuous form the following information:

The name and address of the registrant;

The net weight or other measure prescribed by rule;

The name of the product;

An accurate statement of composition, including the percent of each ingredient;

The purpose of the product;

The date of manufacture, processing, packaging, or repackaging, or a code that permits determination of the date, or, if distributed in bulk, the shipment or delivery date;

Directions for use as specified by rule of the commissioner.

Any soil conditioner or plant amendment distributed in bulk in this state shall be accompanied by a printed or written statement showing the information required in subsection (3) of this section.

Any custom mix delivered in containers shall have placed on or affixed to the container a label, or if delivered in bulk, shall be accompanied by a printed or written statement, which label and statement shall set forth the following information:

The name and address of the manufacturer;

The net weight or measure as prescribed by rule of the commissioner;

The guaranteed analysis and quantity of each registered product contained in the mix;

The date on which the product was manufactured or delivered; and

Directions for use as specified by rule of the commissioner.

No product may be labeled, advertised, distributed, or sold as a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment unless its substance conforms to the applicable definitions prescribed in this article or in the rules promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this article.

No additional substances other than those allowed in section 35-12-103 (12) may be listed or guaranteed on a label or labeling or on a written statement accompanying the bulk distribution of commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners, or plant amendments without the permission of the commissioner. The commissioner may allow additional substances to be listed or guaranteed on the label, labeling, or written statement if satisfactory supportive data is furnished to the commissioner in order to substantiate the value and usefulness of the substance. The commissioner may rely on sources other than the department, such as Colorado state university, for assistance in evaluating the supportive data. If the commissioner permits such additional substances to be listed or guaranteed, the nature of the substances shall be determinable by laboratory methods. The substances shall be subject to inspection and analysis pursuant to methods and procedures prescribed by the commissioner by rule.

The commissioner may allow or require commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners, or plant amendments to be sold and labeled by volume in addition to or instead of by weight pursuant to rules promulgated by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 137, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-5.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1587, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3)(f) repealed, p. 102, § 3, effective March 20.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1615, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-106. Distribution fees.

All registrants, except those who package only in containers of ten pounds or less, shall pay the commissioner a distribution fee as established by the commission for all commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners, or plant amendments distributed in this state. For the purpose of funding the department's state waters protection efforts, an additional fee per ton of commercial fertilizer shall be paid to the commissioner as established by the commission. This increment per ton of commercial fertilizer shall be collected by the commissioner and transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3.

Registrants of specialty fertilizers, soil conditioners, or plant amendments packaged in containers of ten pounds or less shall pay the commissioner a distribution fee as established by the commission, for all specialty fertilizers, soil conditioners, or plant amendments distributed in this state.

Each person registering any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment and each person producing custom mixes in this state shall keep adequate records showing the pounds or tonnage distributed in this state, and the commissioner has the authority to examine such records to verify the statement of pounds or tonnage.

Each registrant shall file an affidavit with the commissioner within forty-five days after the date specified by rule of the commissioner that discloses the pounds or tonnage of commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment distributed in the state during the preceding twelve-month period and any other information as required by rules adopted by the department. If the affidavit is not filed and the distribution fee is not paid within the forty-five-day period, or if the report of pounds or tonnage is false, the commissioner may revoke the registration and assess a penalty established by the commission. The distribution fee and the penalty shall constitute a debt and become the basis for a judgment against the registrant.

When more than one person is involved in the distribution of a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment, the last registrant to distribute the product is responsible for reporting the annual pounds or tonnage and paying the distribution fee, unless the annual report and payment has been made by a prior distributor.

Distribution fees are not required for ingredients that have already been included in the tonnage or pounds for which a Colorado distribution fee has been paid.

The distribution fees required to be paid by this section shall not apply to untreated manure or compost and treated manure distributed without commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment labeling claims.

For each fiscal year, commencing July 1, fifty percent of the direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing this article shall be funded from the general fund. The commission shall establish a fee schedule to cover any direct and indirect costs not funded from the general fund. All moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 138, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-6.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1588, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1334, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 103, § 4, effective March 20.

L. 98:

(8) added, p. 1341, § 65, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended and (9) added, p. 1726, § 6, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(1), (2), and (9) amended, p. 1269, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1), (2), and (9) amended, p. 1904, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1617, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 320, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(8) amended, (HB 10-1377), ch. 212, p. 922, § 2, effective May 6.

L. 2013:

(8)(a) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1697, § 108, effective August 7.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-186), ch. 422, p. 3690, § 5, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (8)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (8)(b), effective July 1, 2012. (See L. 2010, p. 922.)

35-12-107. County tonnage reports. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 138, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-7.

L. 77:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended and (3) added, p. 1589, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 103, § 5, effective March 20.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1619, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Although this section was repealed in 1996, it was contained in a 2008 act that amended this entire article.

35-12-108. Inspection, sampling, and analysis.

The commissioner shall sample, inspect, make analyses of, and test commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners, plant amendments, and compost distributed within this state at such time and place and to such an extent as the commissioner deems advisable to determine whether such products are in compliance with the provisions of this article. The commissioner is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises or carriers during regular business hours in order to access commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners, plant amendments, and compost subject to the provisions of this article and the rules adopted pursuant to this article.

The methods of analysis and sampling shall be those adopted by the commissioner from sources including the association of official analytical chemists international or a successor organization, Colorado state university, or other authoritative sources deemed reliable by the commissioner.

The commissioner, in determining whether any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost violates this article, shall base such determination solely upon official samples obtained and analyzed in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

The result of an analysis of a sample of any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost that indicates a deficiency shall be forwarded promptly to the registrant. Upon request within thirty days after the date the analysis report is forwarded, the commissioner shall furnish to the registrant a portion of any official sample. If, within forty-five days after forwarding of the analysis report indicating a deficiency, no adequate evidence contradicting the analysis report is made available to the commissioner, the report of the sample analysis shall become official.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 139, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-8.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1590, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1619, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-109. Deviation from guaranteed analysis - penalties. (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008.)

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 139, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-9.

L. 77:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1590, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 103, § 6, effective March 20.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1619, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-110. Commercial value. (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008.)

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 140, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-10.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1591, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1620, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-111. Misbranding.

No person shall distribute a misbranded product. A commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost is misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

If it is distributed under the name of another product;

If it is not labeled as required in section 35-12-105 and in accordance with rules prescribed under this article;

If it purports to be, is represented as, or is represented as containing a commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost, unless the plant nutrient, commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost conforms to the definitions of terms prescribed by this article or under the rules promulgated by the commissioner.

In the adoption of such rules, the commissioner shall give due regard to commonly accepted definitions and official terms such as those issued by the association of American plant food control officials or a successor organization.

If it does not conform to the ingredient form, availability, minimums, labeling, and investigational allowances set forth in the rules promulgated by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 140, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-11.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1591, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1620, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-112. Adulteration.

No person shall distribute an adulterated product. A commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost is deemed adulterated:

If it contains any deleterious or harmful substance in sufficient amount to render it injurious to human health or beneficial plant, animal, or aquatic life, when applied in accordance with directions for use on the label or normal application practices, or if adequate warning statements or directions for use, which may be necessary to protect human health or beneficial plant, animal, or aquatic life, are not shown on the label;

If its composition falls below or differs from that which it is purported to possess by its labeling;

If it contains unwanted crop seed or weed seed;

If the concentration of any metal in the product exceeds the level established for that constituent by rule of the commissioner; or

If it contains an infectious agent in sufficient amount to render it injurious to human health or beneficial plant, animal, or aquatic life.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 140, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-12.

L. 77:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, p. 1592, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1621, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-113. Publications.

The commissioner shall publish at least annually, in such form as the commissioner deems proper, information concerning the sales of commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners, and plant amendments, together with such data on their production and use as the commissioner considers advisable, and a report of the results of the analyses based on official samples of commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners, and plant amendments sold within the state as compared with the analyses guaranteed under sections 35-12-103 (14), 35-12-104, and 35-12-105. Information concerning the sale, production, and use of commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners, and plant amendments shall not identify or otherwise disclose the operations of any person.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 140, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-13.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1592, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1621, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-114. Rules.

The commissioner is authorized, pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., to adopt and enforce rules to implement, administer, and enforce this article. The rules shall include, but are not limited to, rules relating to sampling, analytical methods, ingredient form, availability, minimums, exempted materials, investigational allowances, definitions, records, labels, labeling, liability bond, misbranding, mislabeling, commercial fertilizers, specialty fertilizers, soil conditioners, plant amendments, and compost, as may be necessary to carry into effect the full intent and meaning of this article. The commissioner shall not adopt any rule that is inconsistent with a rule promulgated by a state entity for any substance governed by this article.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 141, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-14.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1592, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1621, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-115. Investigations - access - subpoena.

The commissioner, upon the commissioner's own motion or upon the complaint of any person, may make any investigations necessary to ensure compliance with this article.

At any time during regular business hours, for the purpose of carrying out any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article, the commissioner shall have free and unimpeded access upon consent or upon obtaining an administrative search warrant:

To all buildings, yards, warehouses, storage facilities, vehicles, and any other public or private properties, premises, or carriers in which any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost is kept, stored, handled, processed, distributed, or transported;

To all business records related to the production or distribution of any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost, including but not limited to any records required to be kept by this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article. The commissioner may also make copies of such records.

The commissioner shall have full authority to administer oaths and take statements; to issue administrative subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses before the commissioner and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments; and to compel the disclosure by witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey any subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

Complaints of record made to the commissioner and the results of the investigations of the commissioner may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be closed to public inspection, except as permitted by court order, during the investigatory period and until dismissed or until notice of hearing and charges are served. Any action taken by the commissioner shall be a public record as defined in section 24-72-202, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 141, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-15.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1592, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1622, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-116. Cancellation of registration or refusal to register.

The commissioner may revoke or suspend the registration of or may refuse to register any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, or plant amendment upon a finding supported by satisfactory evidence that the registrant or person applying for registration has violated any provision of this article or any rule adopted pursuant to this article. No registration shall be refused, suspended, or revoked until the registrant has been given the notice and opportunity of a hearing required by article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

The commissioner may revoke or suspend the registration of or may refuse to register any manufacturing facility required to be registered under section 35-12-104 (7) or (8) upon a finding that the registrant or person applying for registration has submitted false information to the commissioner or has violated any provision of this article or any rule adopted pursuant to this article. No registration shall be refused, suspended, or revoked until the registrant has been given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 141, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-16.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1593, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1623, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-117. Stop distribution, stop use, or removal orders.

The commissioner may issue and enforce a written or printed stop distribution, stop use, or removal order directed to the owner or custodian of any lot of commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost when the commissioner finds the commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost is being distributed or used in violation of any of the provisions of this article. The commissioner shall release the commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost peat moss, or peat humus from the order when the owner or custodian has complied with requirements of this article and has paid all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the entry and enforcement of such order. Any person who has received a stop distribution, stop use, or removal order may request a hearing, pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to determine whether the violation occurred.

In the event that a person fails to comply with a stop distribution, stop use, or removal order within twenty-four hours after the issuance of the order, the commissioner may bring suit for a temporary restraining order and injunctive relief in order to prevent any further or continued violation of such order.

Matters brought before a court pursuant to this section shall have preference over other matters on the court's calendar.

Whenever the commissioner possesses evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that a person has engaged or is about to engage in a violation of this article or rules adopted pursuant to this article, the commissioner may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article and rules adopted pursuant to this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 141, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-17.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1593, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1623, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-118. Seizure, condemnation, and sale.

Any lot of commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost that is in violation of this article shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the commissioner to a court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the product is located. In the event the court finds the product to be in violation of this article and orders the condemnation of the product, it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the product and the laws of this state. In no instance shall the disposition of the commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner, plant amendment, or compost be ordered by the court without first affording the owner an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the product or for permission to process or relabel the product to bring it into compliance with this article.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 141, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-18.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1593, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1624, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-119. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any rule adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner. The maximum penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation. Each day the violation occurs shall constitute a separate violation.

No civil penalty may be imposed unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect such civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty on the ability of the person charged to stay in business.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 141, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-19.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1624, § 1, effective August 5.

35-12-120. Exchange between manufacturers. (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008.)

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 142, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-13-20.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1594, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire article amended, p. 1625, § 1, effective August 5.